Hawaii, session 2026, SB507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's agricultural industry serves a vital role in providing locally sourced food products, contributing to food security, and supporting the local economy.  The demand for meat products has steadily increased, and the expansion of meat processing capacity in the State is essential to satisfy higher demand while reducing reliance on imported meat products. With the growth of meat processing facilities in the State, the legislature recognizes that there is a pressing need to ensure that a skilled, knowledgeable, and prepared workforce is available to meet the increase in work demand for processing facilities and within the meat processing industry. There is an existing shortage of skilled meat processors in the State, which limits the capacity for local ranchers and farmers to bring their products to market efficiently. The legislature also finds that establishing a comprehensive educational pathway for meat processing at the community college level could provide local students with hands-on opportunities and skills necessary to contribute to the State's agricultural sustainability.  A meat processing educational pathway will support workforce diversification, create high quality jobs, and strengthen rural economies by providing skilled labor to address the growing needs of local meat processing facilities. Similar programs in other states have proven successful in equipping students with the income earning options at the trades and skill labor level, preparing students with the technical expertise required to satisfy industry standards.  The establishment of a meat processing educational pathway further aligns with the State's goal of increasing food security, meeting the goals of the Aloha+ Challenge and the State's overall sustainability goals. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a working group to develop a plan for the creation of a meat processing educational pathway at university of Hawaii community colleges. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of agriculture for administrative purposes a working group to develop a plan to create an educational pathway in the university of Hawaii community college system to equip interested students with the necessary entry level knowledge, skill set, expertise, and advancement potential in the field of meat processing. (b) The working group shall comprise the following members or their designees: (1)  The chairperson of the board of agriculture; (2)  The director of commerce and consumer affairs; (3)  The superintendent of education; (4)  The director of labor and industrial relations; and (5)  The president of the university of Hawaii. (c) The members of the working group shall choose a chairperson from among themselves. (d) Working group members may recommend additional members with relevant knowledge or experience for the chairperson to invite to serve on the working group. (e) No member shall be made subject to chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, solely because of that member's participation on the working group. (f) The working group shall: (1)  Create a curriculum that covers a broad spectrum of topics relevant to meat processing, including but not limited to food safety, animal husbandry, carcass evaluation, meat quality, processing techniques, and regulatory compliance; (2)  Incorporate practical, hands-on training opportunities into the curriculum that allow students to gain real-world experience in meat processing facilities and ensure that students acquire the necessary skills for effective and safe meat handling; (3)  Stay abreast of technological advancements in meat processing and integrate relevant tools and equipment into the curriculum to ensure that students are familiar with the latest industry practices and innovations; (4)  Emphasize the importance of food safety protocols and quality assurance measures throughout the educational pathway; (5)  Provide training on hazard analysis critical control points and other relevant certifications to ensure compliance with industry standards; (6)  Include modules on local, state, and federal regulations that govern meat processing to ensure that students are well-versed in compliance requirements that contribute to the production of safe and legally marketable meat products; (7)  Integrate education on sustainable practices within the meat processing industry that encourage responsible resource use, waste reduction, and environmentally-conscious decision-making; (8)  Foster connections between educational institutions and local businesses to create opportunities for mentorships, internships, and industry partnerships that enhance students' practical knowledge and job placement prospects; (9)  Establish pathways for continuous learning and professional development that enable graduates to stay current with industry trends, regulations, and technological advancements throughout their careers; and (10)  Promote inclusivity within the educational pathway by welcoming individuals from diverse backgrounds and ensuring that the curriculum addresses the needs of a broad and representative spectrum of students, thereby contributing to a more inclusive and equitable meat processing industry. (g) The working group shall submit an interim report of its progress, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026, and submit a final report of its plan, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. (h) The working group shall be dissolved on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________